Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
In General
§ 19-5-63.
Establishment of county extension department.

It is declared to be the policy of this state to develop and promote agriculture, including the raising of livestock, and all enterprises and activities dependent upon the products of the soil, and in line with this policy, to make available to the citizens of this state useful and practical information on subjects relating to agriculture and home economics that research has discovered, to encourage the application of the same, and to obtain all the assistance and advantages that the federal government offers to provide.

The board of supervisors of each county in this state may establish a county extension department in agriculture and home economics. The purpose of this department shall be to disseminate useful information among the farmers, farm women, and farm boys and girls, and to develop the agricultural resources and improve the farm homes of this state.

The county extension departments shall be in charge of a county agent and such assistant county agents and home economics agents as the board of supervisors and the extension department of the Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science may deem adequate to the needs of the county. The board of supervisors upon the recommendation of the director of extension of said university and the approval of the United States Department of Agriculture shall appoint the county agent, assistant county agents and home economics agents, fix their salaries and other necessary expenses, and the amount so fixed shall be paid out of the general fund of the county, but may be supplemented by the extension department of said university and/or the United States Department of Agriculture.

The board of supervisors shall provide office space for the county extension department; shall equip the said office with the necessary office equipment and furniture, and shall also furnish the necessary record books, maps, stationery, postage and other items incidental to the proper operation of the department. The board of supervisors shall also employ such clerical assistance for the department as in the judgment of the board will enable the department to efficiently perform the duties required of it by this section. All such expense shall be paid out of the general fund of the county, but may be supplemented by the extension department of the Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science and/or the United States Department of Agriculture.

It shall be the duty of the county extension department to carry on farm and home demonstration work, boys and girls club work, organized production and cooperative marketing work, and all other phases of extension work under the joint supervision and control of the board of supervisors, the extension department of the Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science and the United States Department of Agriculture, under the provisions of the Smith-Lever act and other related acts of congress.

The duties prescribed by the preceding paragraph shall be construed to include and emphasize actual work in the field as distinguished from executive or administrative tasks or office work. In order that the several county extension departments may fully comply with the requirements of this section and perform the duties required of them, the extension department of the Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science may, upon the approval of the director of extension and the United States Department of Agriculture, employ and pay the salary of an assistant county agent in any county in which the director of extension shall find the services of such assistant necessary and his appointment justified.

The enumeration in the foregoing paragraphs of duties to be performed by agents appointed under this section shall not be taken as exclusive but such agents may perform any duties to accomplish the purposes of this section which they may be directed to perform by the extension department of the Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science with the approval of the United States Department of Agriculture the expense of which is covered in whole or in part by appropriations received from the federal government or any department thereof for agricultural extension work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2964; Laws, 1932, ch. 211; Laws, 1940, ch. 263; Laws, 1942, ch. 207; Laws, 1944, ch. 242, §§ 1-6.

§ 19-5-65.
Funding of display rooms for county home economic or home demonstration agents.

The boards of supervisors of counties of class one of the several counties, in their discretion, are hereby authorized and empowered to appropriate and expend moneys out of the general fund of the county for the purpose of renting or otherwise providing offices or display rooms wherein the county home economic or home demonstration agents may display, offer for sale, and sell products and articles produced under and by virtue of the home demonstration and cooperative marketing program of the county extension department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2964-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 188.

§ 19-5-67.
Establishment of department of animal husbandry.

The boards of supervisors of two (2) or more counties, one or more of which has an incorporated livestock association, are hereby authorized, in their discretion, to establish a joint department of animal husbandry, the purposes of this department being to disseminate useful information pertaining to animal husbandry among the farmers and to develop livestock resources in the several counties.

The said department of animal husbandry shall be under the direction of a joint commissioner to be appointed by the boards of supervisors of the several counties creating this department, which said commissioner shall be a person well versed in the scientific and practical knowledge of animal husbandry. His title shall be district commissioner of animal husbandry, his salary shall be fixed by the boards of supervisors of the counties in said district, and paid out of the general funds of said counties, and his duties shall be to keep in close touch with the United States Department of Agriculture, the Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science, and the state experimental stations, to assist in organizing animal husbandry societies, to look after animal husbandry statistics in the counties, to disseminate useful information pertaining to animal husbandry in the counties, and to advance in every way possible promotion of the industry of animal husbandry in the counties of said district.

The board of supervisors of any county maintaining county extension departments in agriculture and home economics and helping to maintain such joint department of animal husbandry, as provided herein, is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund to help defray the expense of maintaining such departments.

The board of supervisors of any county helping to maintain such joint department of animal husbandry, as herein provided, is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund to help defray the expenses of maintaining a department of dairy husbandry, and the employment of a dairy husbandryman.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2965; Laws, 1938, ch. 318; Laws, 1940, ch. 276; Laws, 1950, ch. 189; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 6, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-5-69.
Funding of buildings for junior beef and dairy boys and girls.

The boards of supervisors of the various counties having livestock shows or associations located therein, and having a department of animal husbandry, as created under Section 19-5-67, and having a total assessed valuation of not exceeding Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), are hereby authorized to donate funds not exceeding Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or lands and materials not exceeding in value Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), and to otherwise aid and assist in the construction of buildings for the use of the junior beef boys and girls and the junior dairy boys and girls.

The board of supervisors of each county qualifying as above set forth is authorized and empowered to borrow a sum not exceeding Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for the purpose of paying for such land, buildings or building material necessary to provide and construct buildings on livestock show grounds or other places selected by the board of supervisors.

The board of supervisors may apply for and receive contributions and allotments of funds, labor and materials from the federal government or any agency thereof, and may cooperate with such governmental agency in constructing the buildings herein authorized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2965-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 432, §§ 1-3.

§ 19-5-71.
Support of experiment stations.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties may, in their discretion, appropriate money from the general funds of the county for the purpose of buying lands, personal property, or equipment of whatever nature and kind, for experiment stations, and may appropriate money from said county funds to aid in the support and maintenance of such experiment stations, whether the same be located within or without the county. When any board of supervisors desire to appropriate funds as herein provided, they shall first publish notice of said proposed expenditure setting forth the amount thereof and the purposes for which said funds are to be used, and upon petition of ten per cent of the qualified electors in said county, the board shall submit to the qualified electors at a special election to be held in said county the question of whether or not said expenditure shall be made, and in the event the majority of the qualified electors shall vote against such expenditure, then the same shall not be made, and such proposal shall not again be made within twelve months from said election.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 283; 1942, § 2981; Laws, 1928, ch. 220.

§ 19-5-73.
Establishment of farmers’ markets.

The board of supervisors of each county may expend monies from the general fund, not exceeding the amount that would be generated from the levy of a one-fourth (1/4) mill ad valorem tax upon all taxable property in the county, for the purpose of providing funds to be expended to establish, maintain and operate farmers’ markets and facilities that are certified by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce and operating within the county to assist in the disposal and sale of farm and other food products in the interest of farmers, consumers and the general public.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2984.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 466, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1954, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 467, § 2; brought forward without change, Laws, 2013, ch. 396, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 19-5-75.
Acquisition of cold storage plants, meat curing plants, warehouses, syrup blending plants, creameries, farm orchard and dairy produce establishments, by certain counties.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi bordering on the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico, or any county in Class 8 whose population is greater than 12,000 and less than 13,000, according to the census of 1940 and whose total area is 500 square miles, is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to borrow funds not to exceed Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), for the purpose of purchasing lands, buildings, building material, labor, machinery and equipment necessary to provide, construct, operate and maintain cold storage plants, meat curing plants, warehouses, syrup blending plants, creameries and establishments for handling, processing, selling or trading in farm orchard, and dairy products.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2975-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 251, § 1.

§ 19-5-77.
Acquisition of cold storage plants, meat curing plants, etc., by certain counties; lease of establishment.

The title to such property shall be taken in the name of the county and the board of supervisors may, upon such terms and conditions as may be fixed by said board by order spread upon its minutes, enter into agreements to lease such establishment to any cooperative association or other agency for use for the purposes enumerated in Section 19-5-75. Such lessee may, in addition to said purposes, use said establishment in performing the other functions of such cooperative association or agency.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2975-02; Laws, 1944, ch. 251, § 2.

§ 19-5-79.
Acquisition of cold storage plants, meat curing plants, etc., by certain counties; issuance of notes, bonds, or loan warrants.

Such board of supervisors may issue notes, bonds or loan warrants to evidence the amount borrowed for said purposes. Said notes, bonds or loan warrants shall bear such rate of interest as may be determined by the board of supervisors, not exceeding, however, six per cent per annum, payable semi-annually. Said notes, bonds or loan warrants shall be in such denomination or denominations and form as may be determined by resolution or order of the board, and they shall be executed in behalf of the county by the president and clerk of said board. The interest to accrue on such notes, bonds or loan warrants on and prior to the respective maturity dates thereof shall be represented by coupons to be attached thereto and which may be executed by the facsimile signature of said officers. Said notes, bonds or loan warrants shall be made to mature over a period of not exceeding ten years, and shall be sold for not less than par and accrued interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2975-03; Laws, 1944, ch. 251, § 3.

§ 19-5-81.
Acquisition of cold storage plants, meat curing plants, etc., by certain counties; notice of intention to borrow; election.

Before issuing the bonds, notes or loan warrants, authorized by Section 19-5-79 the board of supervisors shall publish notice of its intention to borrow such funds and to issue loan warrants, notes or bonds, and the clerk of said board shall publish in three weekly issues of some newspaper having a general circulation in the county, a copy of such order. If, within twenty-one days after the first publication of a copy of such order, twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the county petition the board of supervisors for an election to determine whether or not the adoption of such order should be annulled, such election shall be ordered by said board of supervisors in which the qualified electors of the county shall be eligible to participate. If at such election a majority of those voting vote in favor of the adoption of such order the same shall be valid and effective, but if a majority shall vote against such order it shall be annulled and shall be ineffective. Such election shall be held and conducted and the returns thereof made as provided by law for other county elections. If no such petition be presented within twenty-one days after the first publication of a copy of such order, the order shall be valid and effective and said board may thereupon proceed to issue said loan warrants hereunder without an election on the question of the issuance thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2975-04; Laws, 1944, ch. 251, § 4.

§ 19-5-83.
Acquisition of cold storage plants, meat curing plants, etc., by certain counties; sections as full authority.

Sections 19-5-75 through 19-5-87, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed full and complete authority for the issuance of said notes, bonds or loan warrants, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor, and none of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions or limitations of law applicable to the issuance of bonds, loan warrants or notes by boards of supervisors shall apply to the issuance and sale of loan warrants, bonds or notes under these sections. No proceedings shall be required for the issuance of such loan warrants, bonds or notes other than those provided for and required in these sections, and all powers necessary to be exercised by the board of supervisors, in order to carry out the provisions of these sections are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2975-05; Laws, 1944, ch. 251, § 5.

§ 19-5-85.
Acquisition of cold storage plants, meat curing plants, etc., by certain counties; levy of taxes.

Said loan warrants, bonds or notes shall be general obligations of the county and the board of supervisors of said county shall annually levy a tax upon all taxable property therein sufficient to pay the principal of, and the interest on, such loan warrants, bonds or notes as the same mature and accrue, and the full faith, credit and resources of such county shall be and are hereby irrevocably pledged to the payment of same, both as to principal and interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2975-06; Laws, 1944, ch. 251, § 6.

§ 19-5-87.
Acquisition of cold storage plants, meat curing plants, etc., by certain counties; validation of warrants, bonds or notes.

Said loan warrants, bonds or notes may, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, of such county, be validated under Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2975-07; Laws, 1944, ch. 251, § 7.

§ 19-5-89.
Promotion of youth activities.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi, in which there is located a national cemetery wholly supported by federal funds, and any county having a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) in accordance with the 1950 census, with an area of less than four hundred twenty-five (425) square miles, and an assessed valuation on the basis of the 1950-1954 assessment rolls placing it in Class 5, is authorized to appropriate and expend, in its discretion, a sum not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per annum, to be paid from the general fund of the county, for promoting and financing youth activities in the county, such as Little Boys Baseball, Inc., and other recreational activities for youth. This authority shall also extend to the board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Mississippi River and having an area of four hundred forty-eight (448) square miles with a population not in excess of thirty-two thousand five hundred (32,500) and a municipality therein with a population in excess of twenty-two thousand (22,000) and not more than twenty-three thousand (23,000), all in accordance with the federal census of 1950. Such authority shall also extend to any county having an assessed valuation of less than Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), according to the 1960 federal census, and a portion of which lies in the DeSoto National Forest and having an area of less than four hundred fifty (450) square miles, which shall be authorized, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, to appropriate and expend not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per annum on youth activities. Such authority shall also extend to any city in which there is located a Baptist-supported college founded in 1826, which shall be authorized, in the discretion of the mayor and board of aldermen, to appropriate and expend not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000) per annum on youth activities within the city, such as Little League Baseball, Inc., the YMCA and other recreational activities for youth.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2965-05; Laws, 1958, ch. 227; Laws, 1962, ch. 250; Laws, 1977, ch. 305, eff from and after passage (approved February 24, 1977).

§ 19-5-91.
Agreements with the United States relative to navigation projects.

The board of supervisors of any county through any part of which any river or other stream may run, or any part of which any river or other stream may touch or border, on which the United States of America has authorized navigation projects, including channel clearing, channel improvement, cut-offs, levees, dams, or other navigation projects, is hereby authorized and empowered, for that part of such river or stream running through any part of said county or bordering or touching said county, as aforesaid, to give satisfactory assurances to the United States of America, or any agency thereof, including the Secretary of Defense, that it will:

Provide, without cost to the United States, all lands, easements and rights-of-way necessary for the construction of the project;

Hold and save the United States free from damages due to the construction of the works; and

Maintain and operate all of the works after completion in accordance with regulations prescribed pursuant to the terms of any federal law relating to navigation or to navigable streams.

Any such board of supervisors is also hereby authorized and empowered to accept the conveyance of any lands, easements and rights-of-way over and on behalf of any lands that may be benefited by the maintenance of such works, to accept assurances from landowners whose property is benefited by such navigation projects, to levy, assess and collect such taxes on said area so benefited as will be necessary, to save and hold the United States free from all damages due to the construction of the works and to exercise the right of eminent domain for the condemnation of rights-of-way and easements in like manner as is exercised by boards of supervisors for the condemnation of public road rights-of-way, and to maintain such works in said county after completion and generally to accept agreements for landowners benefited by such navigation projects to save the county harmless on account of said assurances given by the county as aforesaid to the United States of America, or any agency there of, including the Secretary of Defense.

Any such board of supervisors also is authorized to enter into any contracts or agreements with the United States, or any agency or department thereof, to sponsor a project for the environmental restoration of a lake or body of water as described in, and in accordance with the provisions of Section 19-5-92.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2995.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 476, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.).

§ 19-5-92.
Construction of dams and low-water control structures by counties; funding; federal and state assistance.

Any county in the State of Mississippi is authorized to construct a dam or low-water control structure on any lake or natural body of water with an outlet or evidence of the flow or occurrence of water, including a lake or body of water located partially within the county and partially without the county or partially in another state adjacent or contiguous to the State of Mississippi. The county is authorized to use available funds from any source, including county ad valorem taxes, any available monies in the general fund of the county, funds from the issuance of bonds, donations, gifts or through interagency agreements or interlocal cooperation for such funding, for the purpose of carrying out and accomplishing the following functions and activities:

Construction of a dam or low-water control structure on such lake or body of water at such location as the county may deem most advantageous whether within or without the boundaries of the county or whether within or without the boundaries of the State of Mississippi, in whole or in part.

Requesting and obtaining necessary assistance and input from, and coordinating the activities of, any state or federal agency or landowners for the purposes of carrying out and implementing necessary planning, permitting and funding requirements as well as all necessary and proper actions and agreements required of the county for the construction of such a dam or low-water control structure.

Issuance of general obligation bonds in an amount not to exceed the aggregate principal amount of Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) and management of the proceeds from such bond issue in accordance with the terms and provisions of Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31, and subject to the power and authority conferred upon boards of supervisors for the borrowing of money and for the pledging of the full faith and credit of the county.

Any county in the State of Mississippi is authorized to make application to and contract with the United States or any agency or department thereof to sponsor a project or projects for the environmental restoration of such a lake or body of water, including participation as a local sponsor with the United States Army Corps of Engineers in evaluating and constructing water resources projects designed to enhance and restore water quality and habitat value in such lake or body of water, including:

Coordinating activities and assistance of federal, state and local agencies and landowners for the purpose of carrying out and implementing necessary planning, permitting and funding requirements for construction and operation of such projects.

Authorization to enter into project cooperation agreements with the United States Department of Army and to serve as nonfederal sponsors for such projects.

Authorization to expend county funds, apply for, accept as a gift or receive through interagency agreement or interlocal cooperation, technical assistance, in-kind assistance, and acquisition of real estate or leasehold interest as may be necessary and appropriate for such project.

Authorization to acquire in the name of the county through direct purchase or eminent domain procedures and to make available to the United States Department of Army all lands, easements, and rights-of-way required for the construction, implementation, operation and maintenance of such project, including, but not limited to, those required for utility relocations, borrow materials and dredged or excavated material disposal.

Operation, maintenance, repair, replacement and rehabilitation of project features following the completion of such construction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 476, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2001.).

§ 19-5-92.1.
Authority of counties to alter channels of streams and water courses; construction and repair of bridges; erosion prevention; property acquisition and easements; compensation to landowners; financing.

The board of supervisors of any county, whenever the board determines that the health, comfort and convenience of the inhabitants of the county will be promoted, may:

Alter and change the channels of streams or other water courses;

Construct, reconstruct and repair bridges over streams and water courses; and

Incur costs and pay necessary expenses for:

Providing labor, materials and supplies to clean or clear drainage ditches, creeks or channels or conduits, both natural and man-made and to prevent erosion of such ditches, creeks or channels;

Acquiring property and obtaining easements necessary to perform work under this section; and

Reimbursing landowners for damages and injury resulting from work performed by the county under this section.

The work performed and the expenses incurred under subsection (1) of this section may take place on public or private property. However, if the work is to be performed or the expenses to be incurred will take place on private property, the board of supervisors must:

Make a finding, as evidenced by entry upon its minutes, that such work and/or expenses are necessary in order to promote the public health, safety and welfare of the citizens of the county;

Give notice, in writing, to all owners of property that will be affected by the work for such period of time as is reasonable to allow such owners to express any objections;

Not receive written objection to the work by any owners of property that will be affected by the work within the period of time allowed to express objections; and

Unless otherwise agreed, in writing, by the county and the landowner, construct or install a culvert or bridge, at the county’s expense, at an appropriate location or locations to provide the landowner ingress and egress to all of the property to which the landowner had access immediately before performance of the work by the county.

The county shall reimburse landowners for all damages or injury resulting from work performed by the county under this section.

The provisions of this section do not impose any obligation or duty upon a county to perform any work or to incur any expenditures not otherwise required by law to be performed or incurred by a county, nor do the provisions of this section create any rights or benefits for the owner of any public or private property in addition to any rights or benefits as may be otherwise provided by law.

No additional taxes may be imposed for the work authorized under subsection (1) of this section until the board of supervisors adopts a resolution declaring its intention to levy the taxes and establishing the amount of the tax levies and the date on which the taxes initially will be levied and collected. This date shall be the first day of the month, but not earlier than the first day of the second month, from the date of adoption of the resolution. Notice of the proposed tax levy must be published once each week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county. The first publication of the notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days before the date fixed in the resolution on which the board of supervisors proposes to levy the taxes, and the last publication of the notice shall be made not more than seven (7) days before that date. If, within the time of giving notice, fifteen percent (15%) or two thousand five hundred (2,500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the county file a written petition against the levy of the taxes, then the taxes shall not be levied unless authorized by three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors of the county voting at an election to be called and held for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 504, § 1, eff July 3, 2002; Laws, 2004, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.